Wyoming statutes. Title 41 Water
Article 6. Dissolution

Cross references. —

As to dissolution of irrigation districts, see §§

41-7-1001

through

41-7-1006

.

§ 41-9-601.
Petition of landowners.

When the commissioners of a drainage district by unanimous vote of the total membership thereof shall determine to call an election or whenever a majority of the landowners in any drainage district in this state, who shall represent one-half of the ownership of the lands theretofore assessed for benefits and construction within said drainage district, shall file with the commissioners of such district a petition praying for the dissolution thereof, it shall be the duty of the commissioners of such district to forthwith call an election of all of the landowners of said district to determine whether or not such district shall be dissolved.

History.

Laws 1949, ch. 32, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 41-474.

§ 41-9-602.
Election; notice.

Notice of such election shall be published for four (4) successive weeks in one (1) or more newspapers published in each county in which any portion of the lands embraced within such district is situated, stating the time and place of said election and the object thereof, and in addition thereto, the commissioners of said district shall give the same notice as is required in case of annual elections in drainage districts.

History.

Laws 1949, ch. 32, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 41-475.

§ 41-9-603.
Election; conduct; certification of result; report of district indebtedness.

If at any such election which shall be conducted in the same manner as is now provided by law for the conduct of annual elections in drainage districts, a majority of all of the qualified voters owning a majority in acreage of the lands assessed for benefits in the district, shall be in favor of the dissolution of such district, the commissioners of such district shall forthwith certify to the district court having jurisdiction of such district the result of such election, and at the same time shall report to the court the amount and character of the then existing indebtedness of the district. In the event the question of the dissolution of such district does not carry at such election the question shall not again be raised for a period of one (1) year from the date of such election.

History.

Laws 1949, ch. 32, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 41-476.

§ 41-9-604.
Order for hearing on results of election; generally.

Upon the filing of the commissioners’ report and return of election, an order shall be made and entered by the court fixing the time and place for a hearing thereon, at which time and place all creditors and other persons interested may appear and show cause why said district should not be dissolved.

History.

Laws 1949, ch. 32, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 41-477.

§ 41-9-605.
Election hearing results; publication.

A copy of such order to show cause shall be published for four (4) successive weeks prior to said hearing in a newspaper published in each county in which lands embraced in said district be situated.

History.

Laws 1949, ch. 32, § 5; W.S. 1957, § 41-478.

§ 41-9-606.
Hearing; final settlement.

Upon said hearing, the court must find, on the evidence submitted, if the district be ordered dissolved, that the best interests of all parties interested shall be served by the proposed dissolution, and shall determine the amount of the existing indebtedness of such district, if any, and shall make an order requiring the payment of the same. Upon the filing by the commissioners of proper receipts, showing payment of all indebtedness against the district, the court shall thereupon make a final order dissolving the district, and in said order the court may provide for a receiver who shall have full authority to collect and distribute any assets or property formerly belonging to said district, who shall be guided by and shall comply with the provisions of W.S.

1-33-101

through

1-33-110

, and the amendments thereof in the performance of his duties.

History.

Laws 1949, ch. 32, § 6; W.S. 1957, § 41-479.